District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.09

Maximum stay policy.

The Mayor shall devise a policy that encourages tenant businesses to leave the business incubators when a certain level of development is reached, but does not arbitrarily evict a tenant business at a crucial period in its development.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 10, 32 DCR 6334
1981 Ed., § 1-2239.